Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6603
Home health aide; requirements.

On and after September 6, 1991, no person shall act as a home health aide unless such person:

(1) Is at least eighteen years of age;

(2) Is of good moral character;

(3) Has not been convicted of a crime under the laws of this state or another jurisdiction, the penalty for which is imprisonment for a period of more than one year and which is rationally related to the person's fitness or capacity to act as a home health aide;

(4) Is able to speak and understand the English language or the language of the home health agency patient and the home health agency staff member who acts as the home health aide's supervisor;

(5) Meets one of the following qualifications:

(a) Has successfully completed a home health aide training course which meets the standards described in section 71-6608.01;

(b) Is a graduate of a school of nursing;

(c) Has been employed by a licensed home health agency as a home health aide II prior to September 6, 1991;

(d) Has successfully completed a course in a school of nursing which included practical clinical experience in fundamental nursing skills and has completed a competency evaluation as described in section 71-6608.02;

(e) Has successfully completed a basic course of training approved by the department for nurse aides as required by section 71-6039 and has completed a competency evaluation as described in section 71-6608.02;

(f) Has been employed by a licensed home health agency as a home health aide I prior to September 6, 1991, and has completed a competency evaluation as described in section 71-6608.02; or

(g) Has met the qualifications equal to one of those contained in subdivisions (a) through (f) of this subdivision in another state or territory of the United States; and

(6) Has provided to the employing licensed home health agency proof of meeting the requirements of this section.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 118;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 55;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 63;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 16.